Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2579.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-37 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-37. Termination of periodic tenancy.
(a) The landlord or the tenant may terminate a week-to-week tenancy by a written notice,
in a form substantially similar to that provided in § 34-18-56(c), delivered to the other at least ten
(10) days before the termination date specified in the notice.
(b) The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month-to-month tenancy or any periodic
tenancy for more than a month or less than a year by a written notice, in a form substantially similar
to that provided in § 34-18-56(c), delivered to the other at least thirty (30) sixty (60) days before
the date specified in the notice, or at least one hundred twenty (120) days before the date specified
in the notice for tenants aged sixty-two (62) years or older.
(c) The landlord or tenant may terminate a year-to-year tenancy by written notice, in a form
substantially similar to that provided in § 34-18-56(c), delivered to the other at least three (3)
months prior to the expiration of the occupation year.
SECTION 2. Section 34-18-56 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-56. Notices and complaint forms.
(a) A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving
a tenant a five (5) day demand for payment of rent prior to commencement of an eviction pursuant

to § 34-18-35:
FIVE-DAY DEMAND NOTICE FOR NONPAYMENT OF RENT
R.I.G.L. 34-18-35
Date of Mailing: _____________________
TO: __________________________
(tenant)
_____________________________
_____________________________
You are now more than fifteen days in arrears for some or all of the rent owed under your
rental agreement. State law requires that you be sent this Notice of arrearage.
Unless you make payment of all rent in arrears within five days of the date this notice was
mailed to you, an eviction action may be instituted in court against you. You can prevent the
eviction by paying all rent owing within five days of the mailing of this notice.
If you believe you have a legal reason for not paying this rent, you will be able to present
that defense at the eviction hearing. The rent in arrears as of the above date is $_____________.
__________________________
________
(signature)
__________________________
________
__________________________
________
(name and address of land-
lord/owner)
I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice,
addressed to the tenant, on the ________ day of ________________________, 20______.
__________________________
________
(landlord or owner
signature)
(b) A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving
a tenant a notice of noncompliance with the rental agreement pursuant to § 34-18-36:
NOTICE OF NONCOMPLIANCE
R.I.G.L. 34-18-36
LC004825 - Page 2 of 17

Date of Mailing: ____________________
TO: __________________________
(tenant)
_____________________________
_____________________________
(address)
You are in breach of your rental agreement, or of your legal duties under R.I.G.L. 34-18-
24, because you:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
(provide details)
To remedy this situation you must do the following within twenty days of the date of
mailing of this Notice:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
If you do not remedy this situation within twenty days, your rental agreement will terminate
without further notice on __________ (date, which must be not less than twenty-one days from the
date of mailing of this Notice). (NOTE: Under the law you lose this right to remedy your
noncompliance if this is the second notice on the same subject within the past six months.) After
that date an eviction case may begin in court, and you may be served with a complaint. You will
have the right to a hearing and to present any defenses you believe you have.
__________________________
________
(signature)
__________________________
________
__________________________
________
(name and address of land-
lord/owner)
I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice,
addressed to the tenant, on the ________ day of ________________________, 20______.
LC004825 - Page 3 of 17

__________________________
________
(landlord or owner
signature)
(c) A notice in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of giving
a tenant notice of termination of tenancy pursuant to § 34-18-37:
NOTICE OF TERMINATION OF TENANCY
R.I.G.L. 34-18-37
Date of Mailing: _______________________
TO: _________________________
(tenant)
_____________________________
_____________________________
(address)
You are hereby directed to vacate and remove your property and personal possessions from
the premises located at __________________________________ and deliver control of the
premises to the
(address of premises)
landlord/owner on the first day after the end of your current rental period, namely
____________________, 20_____ rental period, namely __________________.
(insert
date)
This notice is given for the purpose of terminating your tenancy. You must continue to pay
rent as it becomes due until the date indicated above. If you fail to pay that rent, a nonpayment
eviction action may be instituted against you.
If you fail to vacate the premises by the date specified, an eviction may be instituted against
you without further notice. If you believe you have a defense to this termination, you will be able
to raise that defense at the court hearing.
__________________________
________
(signature)
__________________________
________
__________________________
LC004825 - Page 4 of 17

________
(name and address of land-
lord/owner)
I certify that I placed in regular U.S. mail, first class postage prepaid, a copy of this Notice,
addressed to the tenant, on the ________ day of ________________________, 20______.
__________________________
________
(landlord or owner
signature)
(d) A complaint in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of
commencing an eviction action for nonpayment of rent pursuant to § 34-18-35:
State of Rhode Island
_______________________, Sc. DISTRICT
COURT
____________________________ _____________
DIVISION
PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT
____________________________
__________________________
________
(Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name)
V
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(address) (address of rental
premises)
COMPLAINT FOR EVICTION
LC004825 - Page 5 of 17

FOR NONPAYMENT OF RENT
R.I.G.L. 34-18-35
1. Plaintiff is the owner/landlord of the rental premises listed above, in which the Defendant
Tenant currently resides.
2. Defendant is more than fifteen days in arrears in rental payments due to the plaintiff from
the defendant. The rent is $__________ per __________, and the amount in arrears is $________
as of the __________ day of __________, 20____.
(month)
3. Plaintiff has served the five-day demand notice as required by law, and a copy of that
notice is attached to this complaint. The notice was mailed to the defendant on the __________ day
of ________, 20____.
4. Defendant has not paid the rent in arrears or offered the full amount in arrears, either
before or after the demand notice. Defendant remains in possession of the rental premises.
WHEREFORE, Plaintiff requests that this Court grant a judgment for possession of the
premises (eviction of the tenant) and for back rent in the amount of $______________, plus costs.
__________________________
________
(Name & address of
landlord/owner
or attorney for landlord)
__________________________
________
Date complaint filed with clerk __________________
(e) A complaint in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of
commencing an eviction action for noncompliance with the rental agreement pursuant to § 34-18-
36, or an eviction action for unlawfully holding over after expiration or termination of the tenancy
pursuant to § 34-18-38:
STATE OF RHODE ISLAND
_______________________, Sc. DISTRICT
COURT
____________________________ _____________
DIVISION
PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT
____________________________
LC004825 - Page 6 of 17

__________________________
________
(Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name)
V
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(address) (address of rental
premises)
COMPLAINT FOR EVICTION
FOR REASON OTHER THAN
NONPAYMENT OF RENT
R.I.G.L. 34-18-36
R.I.G.L. 34-18-38
1. Plaintiff Landlord(s) owns the rental premises listed above, in which the Defendant
Tenant(s) resides.
2. CHECK ONE:
____ Defendant breached the tenant's obligations under the rental agreement or § 34-18-
24 as set forth in the attached copy of the notice of noncompliance which was mailed to the
defendant. Defendant has not cured or remedied the breach. (Plaintiff must attach copy of required
notice of noncompliance.)
____ Defendant has remained in possession of the rented premises following the period set
forth in the attached notice of termination of tenancy which was mailed to defendant. (Plaintiff
must attach copy of required termination notice.)
____ Defendant breached the tenants' obligations under § 34-18-24(8), (9) or (10).
3. Plaintiff seeks judgment for possession of the premises plus judgment in the amount of
_______________________________________________________________________
for ____________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
LC004825 - Page 7 of 17

(explain basis for money claim)
Plaintiff seeks costs and fees (if applicable).
__________________________
________
(Signature of Landlord/Owner or
Attorney)
__________________________
________
Date complaint filed with clerk __________
(f) A complaint in substantially the following language, or in similar language, shall be
sufficient for use by landlords or by tenants to bring any claims or causes of action other than
eviction actions:
NOT FOR EVICTION
State of Rhode Island
_______________________, Sc. DISTRICT
COURT
____________________________ _____________
DIVISION
PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT
____________________________
__________________________
________
(Name) (Name)
V
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(address) (address of rental
LC004825 - Page 8 of 17

premises)
LANDLORD-TENANT COMPLAINT
(NOT FOR USE IN EVICTIONS)
1. Plaintiff is the ____ Tenant ____ Landlord/Owner of the rental premises
at. _____________________________________________________________________
(address of rental premises)
2. Defendant is the ____ Tenant ____ Landlord/Owner.
3. Plaintiff claims that defendant has breached the obligations of the rental agreement or
law in relation to this landlord-tenant relationship, as follows:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
(brief description of claim, attach extra sheet, if necessary)
4. Plaintiff seeks the following judgment or relief from the Court:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
Date Complaint Filed
__________________________
________
With Clerk: __________ (Signature of plaintiff or
plaintiff's
attorney)
__________________________
________
(address)
(g) The summons in an action for eviction for nonpayment of rent pursuant to § 34-18-35
shall be in substantially the following form:
STATE OF RHODE ISLAND
DISTRICT COURT
SU
MMONS
EVICTION-NONPAYMENT OF RENT
DIVISION COUNTY CIVIL ACTION-FILE NO.
LC004825 - Page 9 of 17

Address of Court:
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(name & address of plaintiff landlord) (name & address of
defendant-tenant)
TO THE TENANT: You are served with an eviction complaint for nonpayment of rent. If
you do nothing, you will lose by default and be evicted. If you claim any defense, you must
complete the enclosed ANSWER and file it with the Court Clerk at or before the hearing date. You
should also mail a copy to the landlord or the landlord's lawyer. Your hearing will be at 9:30 A.M.
on the hearing date, at the court address listed above. You should go to the hearing or you may lose
by default. If you think the case is "settled," you should still go to the hearing to make sure the
settlement is in the court record.
YOUR HEARING DATE IS: ________________________________.
(Proof of Service on next page)
________________________________________
PROOF OF SERVICE
I hereby certify that I served a copy of the Complaint and Summons & Answer upon the
defendant(s) by delivering or leaving said papers in the following manner:
______ to the defendant personally; or
______ at his or her dwelling unit or usual place of abode
at the
address listed below with a person of suitable age
then
residing therein; or
______ if none be found, by posting conspicuously on the
door
to the defendant's dwelling unit.
LC004825 - Page 10 of 17

ADDRESS OF DWELLING OR USUAL PLACE OF ABODE:
_________________________________________________________
NAME OF PERSON OF SUITABLE AGE:


SERVICE DATE:
______________________________________________________________________
DEPUTY SHERIFF/CONSTABLE:
______________________________________________________________________
______________________________________________________________________
CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE
I hereby certify that a copy of this Complaint and Summons was placed into regular U.S.
Mail, postage prepaid, on the __________________ day of ________________, 20____, addressed
to defendant at the following address:
________________________________________________.
__________________________
________
(Signature of ____________
Clerk)
(h) The summons in an action for eviction for noncompliance with the rental agreement
pursuant to § 34-18-36, or for unlawfully holding over after termination or expiration of tenancy
pursuant to § 34-18-38, shall be in substantially the following form:
State of Rhode Island
District Court
Summons
EVICTION FOR REASON OTHER THAN NONPAYMENT OF RENT
DIVISION COUNTY CIVIL ACTION-
FILE NO.
Address of Court:
__________________________________
__________________________
________
V
__________________________________
LC004825 - Page 11 of 17

__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(name & address of plaintiff landlord) (name & address of defendant-
tenant)
TO THE TENANT: You are served with an eviction complaint for noncompliance with
rental agreement (R.I.G.L. 34-18-36), or for unlawfully holding over after termination or expiration
of tenancy (R.I.G.L. 34-18-38). If you do nothing, you will lose by default and be evicted. If you
claim any defense, you must complete the enclosed ANSWER and file it with the Court Clerk
within TWENTY (20) days after you are served with this summons and complaint. You should also
mail a copy of the ANSWER to the landlord or the landlord's lawyer. If you file the enclosed
ANSWER, then you will receive another written notice telling you when the hearing will be. If you
have any questions, you may consult a lawyer. If you think the case is "settled" you should still file
the enclosed ANSWER or be sure that the written settlement is in the file at the Clerk's office.
(Proof of Service on next page)
________________________________________
PROOF OF SERVICE
I hereby certify that I served a copy of the Complaint, Summons, and Answer form upon
the defendant(s) by delivering or leaving said papers in the following manner:
____ to the defendant personally
____ at his/her dwelling unit or usual place of abode at the address listed below, with a
person of suitable age then residing therein
____ to an agent named below authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of
process
____ further notice as required by law was given as noted below
Address of dwelling or usual place of abode:
______________________________________________________________________
Name of person of suitable age or of agent:
______________________________________________________________________
Service Date: ____________________
Deputy Sheriff/Constable (circle one):
__________________________
LC004825 - Page 12 of 17

________
(signature)
(i) The summons in an action relating to any claims by tenants, or by landlords other than
for eviction, shall be in substantially the following form:
State of Rhode Island
District Court
Summons
____________ ____________
_____________________________
DIVISION COUNTY CIVIL ACTION-
FILE NO.
_____________________________
_____________________
________
PLAINTIFF PLAINTIFF'S
ATTORNEY
__________________________
________
ADDRESS
_________________ vs
DEFENDANT
__________________________
________
DEFENDANT'S ADDRESS
______________________________
__________________________
________
TO THE ABOVE-NAMED DEFENDANT:
You are hereby summoned and required to serve upon the plaintiff's attorney, whose name
and address appears above, an answer to the complaint which is herewith served upon you. Your
answer must be made within 20 days after service of this summons, excluding the date of service.
The original must be filed in writing with this court. If you fail to do so, judgment by default will
be taken against you for the relief demanded in the complaint.
______________________________
LC004825 - Page 13 of 17

__________________________
________
DATE CLERK
______________________________
__________________________
________
SEAL OF THE DISTRICT COURT DATE
RECEIVED
______________________________________________________________________
PROOF OF SERVICE
I hereby certify that on the date below I served a copy of this summons and a copy of the
complaint received herewith upon the above-named defendant by delivering or leaving said papers
in the following manner:
□ to the defendant personally.
□ at his dwelling house or usual place of abode at the address entered
below, with a person of suitable age and discretion then residing therewith.
□ to an agent named below authorized by appointment or by law to receive
service of process.
□ Further notice as required by statute was given as noted on the reverse
side.
______________________________________________________________________
Address of Dwelling or Usual Place of Abode
______________________________________________________________________
Name of Authorized Agent or Person of Suitable Age
______________________________
__________________________
________
Date Deputy Sheriff/Constable
______________________________
__________________________
________
SERVICE FEE $________
(j) The blank answer served in eviction actions shall be in substantially the following form:
State of Rhode Island
LC004825 - Page 14 of 17

_______________________, Sc. DISTRICT
COURT
____________________________ _____________
DIVISION
PLAINTIFF DEFENDANT
____________________________
__________________________
________
(Landlord's Name) (Tenant's Name)
V
__________________________________
__________________________
________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
(address) (address of rental
premises)
INSTRUCTIONS TO THE DEFENDANT
Listed below are several possible defenses to the eviction action your landlord has filed
against you. If one or more of these defenses apply to your case, check the appropriate box(es). If
space is provided, write in facts in support of that defense. Use additional paper if necessary. Some
of these defenses are technical, and there may be others not listed here. You may consult a lawyer
and seek representation before filling out this Answer.
TENANT'S ANSWER
The complaint against me is untrue or fails to state the following facts:
I offered rent, but my landlord refused it. I am still able and willing to pay the rent.
I have a defense for nonpayment because the landlord has failed to maintain the premises
in a fit and habitable condition.
My rent has not been paid, but I have a legally justifiable defense for not paying:
I have a written lease which does not expire until:
I have not received the required notice from the landlord before this complaint was served
on me.
The landlord is trying to evict me because I have exercised my legal rights by calling code
LC004825 - Page 15 of 17

enforcement officials, or by taking the following protected action:
I have other defenses as follow:
WHEREFORE: Because of the defense(s) indicated above, I ask the court to grant a
judgment in my favor and not order me to be evicted.
COUNTERCLAIM
Instructions: If you believe you are entitled to be awarded damages or money for any reason
from your landlord, you may fill out the statement below:
I hereby sue my landlord for the amount of $_____________.
I believe I am entitled to receive an award of this amount because
______________________________________________________________________
__________________________________
__________________________
________
Name of Defendant (or attorney) Signature of Defendant
___________________________________
Address
___________________________________
Telephone number
___________________________________
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004825
========
LC004825 - Page 16 of 17